California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(h) The State of California pledges and agrees with the holders of the bonds issued pursuant to this chapter, and with those parties who may enter into contracts with the San Diego Association of Governments pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, that the state will not limit, alter, or restrict the rights hereby vested in the San Diego Association of Governments to finance the toll bridge improvements and other projects and programs authorized by this chapter. The State of California pledges and agrees not to impair the terms of any agreements made with the holders of bonds, and with the parties who may enter into contracts with the San Diego Association of Governments pursuant to this chapter, and pledges and agrees not to impair the rights or remedies of the holders of any revenue bonds or any parties until the bonds, together with interest, are fully paid and discharged and any contracts are fully performed on the part of the San Diego Association of Governments.

(i) The San Diego Association of Governments may include the pledges made under this section in its revenue bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 729, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Toll Bridges, Toll Roads, and Toll Ferries Generally [30800. - 30902.]



  ARTICLE 1. Franchises [30800. - 30814.]

30800.

The department has exclusive jurisdiction and, except as provided in this article, may grant upon the terms, limitations, conditions, and restrictions and under the supervision as in its judgment are necessary or proper, franchises, privileges, or licenses for the construction or operation of toll bridges, toll roads, and toll ferries and for the taking and keeping of tolls from the bridges, roads, and ferries situated wholly or in part within the state. “Toll ferries” do not include vessels operated by common carriers providing transportation service subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1088, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

30801.

The department shall require the grantee of any such franchise, privilege, or license to pay a license tax or fee of not less than ten dollars ($10) or more than one hundred dollars ($100) a month, the amount of which shall be fixed in the franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30802.

The department may fix the rate of tolls, and from time to time regulate, modify, and change any such tolls which may be collected on any toll bridge, toll roads, or toll ferries which are built, constructed, or established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30803.

The rate of toll fixed, regulated, modified, or changed shall be determined by the department after hearing has been had thereon and a written finding rendered. Findings rendered by the department are conclusive as to the facts recited therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30804.

The department may provide as a condition or limitation in any franchise granted pursuant to this article for the purchase or retaking of any toll bridge, toll road, or toll ferry constructed or established by virtue of a franchise issued pursuant to this article, upon such terms and conditions as are determined by the department at the time of the execution of the franchise. The conditions and limitations upon which any franchise is granted shall be set forth in full in the instrument executed evidencing the granting of the franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30805.

Every person operating any toll road, toll bridge, or toll ferry within the State under any franchise granted pursuant to this article shall keep an accurate account showing the following:

(a) The cost of construction thereof and the amount expended in keeping such toll road, toll bridge, or toll ferry in repair.

(b) The cost for operation and maintenance thereof.

(c) A record of the true financial condition of such person. On or before March 15th of each year, he shall file with the
 department a statement for the preceding calendar year setting forth such information, verified by himself, or if a firm, association, or corporation by some member or officer thereof having knowledge of the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30806.

The department shall prescribe:

(a) A uniform system of accounts for all such toll roads, toll bridges, and toll ferries:

(b) The manner in which the account of costs of construction, repair, operation, and maintenance thereof and the annual statement of expenditures and revenues shall be kept.

(c) The forms of the statements required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30807.

The department may make orders and prescribe rules and regulations with respect to toll roads, and toll bridges, or toll ferries in conformity with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30808.

All money received from any franchise granted by the department pursuant to this article shall be deposited in the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 245.)
-------------------------------------------

30809.

The enforcement and administration of this article is declared to be a part of the highway program of the state, and all necessary expenditures of the department therefor are payable out of the State Highway Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 246.)
-------------------------------------------

30809.1.

Private entities shall reimburse the Department of the California Highway Patrol for the actual costs incurred by that department for traffic enforcement services rendered pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 23251 of the Vehicle Code on toll highways which are publicly owned and privately operated. All funds collected by the Department of the California Highway Patrol shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1241, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

30810.

The board of supervisors shall not grant franchises and licenses for the construction, taking, and keeping of tolls on roads, bridges, and ferries in its county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30811.

This article does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any person who on August 14, 1929, held a franchise for a toll bridge or toll road or operated a toll bridge or toll road under such a franchise, or to any toll road or toll bridge franchise existing on that date.

(b) Any person who on August 21, 1933, held a franchise for a toll ferry or operated a toll ferry under such a franchise, or to any toll ferry franchise existing on that date.

(c) Any toll ferry operated or to be
 operated by a municipality.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30812.

This article does not prevent the State, or any city, county, incorporated bridge and highway district, or joint highway district from acquiring or constructing toll roads, toll bridges, and toll ferries under the restrictions imposed by any law authorizing the construction, acquisition, or condemnation of toll roads, or toll bridges through the use of revenue bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30813.

This article does not conflict in any manner with any law authorizing the construction, acquisition, or condemnation of toll roads or toll bridges through the use of revenue bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30814.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no toll shall be imposed on the passage of a pedestrian, a bicycle, or a personal micromobility device, as defined in Section 1940.41 of the Civil Code, over any bridge that is part of the state highway system, on which the travel of pedestrians, bicycles, or personal micromobility devices is otherwise authorized, and on which tolls are imposed on the passage of motor vehicles, including any bridge constructed pursuant to a franchise granted under this article.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if the bridge was under construction on or
 after January 1, 2025, and if the tolls are used to fund the cost of constructing the bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 731, Sec. 3.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Regulations [30840. - 30847.]

30840.

No person shall construct or take tolls on a bridge or ferry unless authorized by the governmental agency which has or had power to issue a franchise therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30841.

Any person who without authority of law demands or receives compensation for the use of any bridge or ferry or sets up or keeps any road, bridge, ferry, or constructed ford for the purpose of receiving any remuneration for its use is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30843.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle over a toll bridge or toll highway crossing and the approaches thereto constructed or acquired by any bridge and highway district, at the entrance to which appropriate signs have been erected to notify traffic that it is entering upon a toll bridge crossing or its approaches and is subject to the payment of tolls beyond the sign, is guilty of a misdemeanor in each of the following cases:

(a) If the person refuses to pay the tolls.

(b) If the person turns, or attempts to turn, the vehicle around in the bridge, approach, or toll plaza where signs have been erected forbidding the turning.

(c) If the person refuses to pass through the toll gates after having come within the area where signs have been erected notifying traffic that it is entering the area where toll is collectible or where vehicles may not turn around and where vehicles are required to pass through the toll gates for the purpose of collecting tolls.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 739, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

30844.

Any person who maliciously injures or destroys any toll house or gate is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30845.

Any person who enters into an undertaking to keep and attend a ferry and violates the conditions of such undertaking is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30847.

Every corporation incorporated for the purpose of operating a toll bridge or toll ferry may be dissolved in any of the following cases:

(a) If within one year after filing its articles of incorporation, it has not obtained such authority from the governmental agency having authority to issue a franchise therefor, and if within one year thereafter it has not commenced the construction of the bridge, and if within two years after obtaining such authority, there has not been actually expended thereon a sum equal to at least 10 percent of the issued capital stock of the corporation.

(b) If within seven years after the time the authority to construct the bridge was granted, or any lawful extension thereof, the bridge is not completed. The governmental agency may from time to time by order extend the time of completion beyond seven years, if the actual and physical work of constructing the bridge has been diligently prosecuted from the time of commencement up to the time that application for such extension is presented to it.

(c) If the bridge of the corporation is destroyed and is not reconstructed and ready for use within three years thereafter.

(d) If the ferry of any such corporation is not in running order within one year after authority is obtained to establish it, or if at any time thereafter the corporation ceases for a like term consecutively to perform the duties imposed by
 law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Toll Bridges Under Franchises Granted Prior to 1929 and Toll Ferries Under Franchises Granted Prior to 1933 [30860. - 30873.]

30860.

This article applies only to the following:

(a) Any person who on August 14, 1929, held a franchise for a toll bridge or operated a toll bridge under such a franchise, or to any toll bridge franchise existing on that date.

(b) Any person who on August 21, 1933, held a franchise for a toll ferry or operated a toll ferry under such a franchise, or to any toll ferry franchise existing on that date.

This article does not apply to or affect any ferry owned or operated as a municipal ferry by any city over
 waters situated in whole or in part within the limit of such city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30861.

The license tax and rate of toll as originally fixed by the board of supervisors shall not be increased or diminished at any time during the term of 20 years, unless it is shown to the satisfaction of the board of supervisors that the receipts from tolls in any one year is disproportionate to the cost of construction or erection, or the fair cash value thereof, together with the cost of all necessary repairs and maintenance of the bridge or ferry. The license tax fixed by the board shall not exceed 10 percent of the tolls annually collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30862.

Every owner or keeper of a toll bridge or ferry shall report annually to the board of supervisors from which his license is obtained, under oath, the following facts:

(a) The actual cost of the construction or erection and equipment of the toll bridge or ferry.

(b) The repairs made during the preceding year and the actual cost thereof.

(c) The expense of labor, hire of agents, and other costs necessarily incurred in and about the conduct of the business.

(d) The amount of amortization and taxes actually paid in and about the conduct of the business.

(e) The amount of tolls collected.

(f) The estimated actual cash value of the bridge or ferry exclusive of the franchise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30863.

The president and secretary of every toll bridge and toll ferry corporation shall annually, under oath, report to the board of supervisors of the county in which the articles of incorporation are filed:

(a) The cost of constructing and providing all necessary appendages and appurtenances for the bridge, or ferry.

(b) The amount of all money expended thereon since its construction for repairs and incidental expenses.

(c) The amount of its capital stock, amount paid in, and the amount
 thereof actually expended.

(d) The amount received during the year for tolls, and from all other sources, stating each separately.

(e) The amount of dividends made, and the indebtedness of the corporation, specifying for what it was incurred.

(f) Such other facts and particulars respecting the business of the corporation, as the board of supervisors requires.

The president and secretary shall cause the report to be published for four weeks in a daily newspaper published nearest the bridge or ferry, if required by order of the board of supervisors.

Any corporation failing to make such report is subject to a penalty of two hundred dollars ($200), and for every week permitted to elapse after such failure an additional penalty of fifty
 dollars ($50), payable in each case to the county from which the authority of the corporation was derived. All violations shall be reported by the board of supervisors to the district attorney, who shall commence an action therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30864.

Whenever the board of supervisors is about to fix the license tax and rate of tolls on a bridge or ferry it shall make inquiry into the present actual cash value and the cost of all necessary repairs and maintenance thereof, and for that purpose may examine, under oath, the owner or keeper and other witnesses, and the assessed value of the bridge or ferry on the assessment-roll of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30865.

If the estimate of the board is not agreed to by the owner or keeper of the bridge or ferry, it shall be fixed by three commissioners, one to be appointed by the board, one by the owner and keeper, and the third by the presiding judge of the superior court, who shall hear testimony and fix the value and cost according to the facts, and report it to the board of supervisors under oath. In all estimates of the fair cash value of the bridge or ferry the value of the franchise shall not be taken into consideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 79.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30866.

When the cost of construction or erection and equipment of the bridge or ferry, or the fair cash value thereof, together with the cost of needed repairs and the conduct and maintenance thereof, is ascertained and fixed for the preceding year, the board shall on such ascertained amount fix the annual license tax, rate of tolls, and the amount of the penal bond, and direct a license to be issued by the clerk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30867.

The owner or keeper of the toll bridge or ferry shall furnish a bond in the sum fixed by the board of supervisors and conditioned that the toll bridge or toll ferry will be kept in good repair and condition, and that the keeper will faithfully comply with the laws of the state and all legal orders of the board of supervisors regulating it, and pay all damages recovered against the owner or keeper by any person injured or damaged by reason of delay at or defect in the bridge or ferry, or in any manner resulting from non-compliance with the laws or lawful orders regulating it. The bond shall be approved by the chairman and filed with the clerk of the
 board of supervisors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 383.)
-------------------------------------------

30868.

The license tax for a toll ferry or toll bridge connecting two counties shall be paid to the treasurer of the county granting it, and the license issued by the auditor thereof. The treasurer of such county shall pay to the treasury of the county in which the other end or landing of the bridge or ferry is located, one-half the sum so received annually, or the auditor may issue the license on filing with him receipts for their respective halves of the tax taken from the treasurer of the two counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30869.

A supervisor who is interested in an application to erect, construct, or take tolls, or alter tolls on a bridge or ferry shall not act in any such matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30870.

Every licensed toll bridge or toll ferry shall have the rates of toll as fixed by the board of supervisors, printed or written, posted up in some conspicuous place on or near the bridge or ferry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30871.

The proceeds of the license tax on ferries and toll-bridges shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of roads and highways, or may be used by the board of supervisors at any time in the purchase of toll-roads and toll-bridges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30872.

All ferry and toll bridge keepers shall keep the banks of the streams or waters at the landings of their ferries or ridges graded and in good order for the passage of vehicles. For every day compliance herewith is neglected twenty-five dollars ($25) is forfeited, to be collected for the use of the road fund of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30873.

Any penalty recovered for any violation of the rights or obligations of the toll bridges or toll ferries described in this article shall be paid to the county treasury for the use of the general road fund of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Toll Bridge Revenues [30880. - 30894.]

30880.

It is the intent of the Legislature that toll bridge revenues be used to further the development of public transportation systems in the vicinity of toll bridges in order to alleviate automobile-related congestion and pollution and to diminish the need for state expenditures on new bridge facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------

30881.

“Authority” means the Bay Area Toll Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30882.

“Commission” means the Metropolitan Transportation Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------

30883.

“Department” means the Department of Transportation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------

30884.

(a) “Net transit revenues” means those revenues of the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge, and the Dumbarton Bridge determined by the authority as derived from the toll increase instituted by the commission in 1977. The calculation of the amount of the net transit revenues is equal to 16 percent of the revenue generated each year from the collection of the base toll at its level in existence for the 2001–02 fiscal year on the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge, the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge, and the Dumbarton
 Bridge.

(b) The net transit revenues are subordinate to all of the following:

(1) The obligation to pay necessary costs of toll collection operation.

(2) The obligations of the authority under any bond resolution or indenture applicable to the toll bridges issued by the authority.

(3) The obligation to repay any advances made to the department from any other source for studies and work preliminary to the financing of any toll bridge project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30885.

“Toll bridge” means any state-owned bridge, including the approaches to the toll bridge from the nearest highway that is not for the exclusive use of toll bridge traffic, located within the region under the jurisdiction of the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30886.

To maximize the availability of funding necessary to complete the state toll bridge seismic retrofit program, to more efficiently manage the toll revenues from the toll bridges located within the region under the jurisdiction of the commission, and to expeditiously complete the seismic retrofit and replacement of the toll bridge facilities identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 188.5, it is necessary and in the public’s interest to consolidate the financial management of all of the toll revenues that are imposed by Sections 30916, 31010, and
 31011 and that the Bay Area Toll Authority manage all of those toll revenues.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 4.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30887.

The authority may increase the toll rates specified in the adopted toll schedule only if this is necessary in order to enable the authority to meet its obligations under any bond resolution or indenture.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30889.3.

(a) The authority may grant toll-free passage or may adopt a reduced-rate schedule of tolls for vehicles occupied by three or more persons, including the driver, and for buses crossing the bridges. The reduced-rate toll for those vehicles shall be determined by the authority in consultation with the department, and may consist of reduced daily tolls or payment in lieu of daily tolls. If the authority grants toll-free passage or adopts a reduced-rate toll schedule under this subdivision, it shall grant toll-free passage or adopt the same
 schedule for class I vehicles designed by the manufacturer to be occupied by not more than two persons, including the driver, if these vehicles are occupied by two persons, including the driver.

(b) Tolls on the bridges shall be maintained at rates sufficient to meet any obligations to the holders of bonds secured by the bridge toll revenues, as set forth in any bond resolution or indenture or obligation contained in bonds issued pursuant to the bond resolution or indenture, and the authority shall revise or eliminate the reduced-rate toll schedule adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) as necessary to ensure compliance with those obligations.

(c) The authority may also vary, as it deems advisable, the toll rates applicable to a vehicle operated on the bridges for the carriage of passengers by any municipal or public corporation, transit district, public utility district, political
 subdivision, or by a transportation company operating under a certificate of public convenience and necessity. The authority shall consult with the affected operators prior to adopting any toll rate pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 52.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30890.

The authority shall transfer the net transit revenues, as defined in Section 30884, to the commission on a regularly scheduled basis as set forth in the authority’s annual budget resolution.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 54.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30891.

The commission may retain, for its cost in administering this article, an amount not to exceed one-quarter of 1 percent of the revenues allocated by it pursuant to Section 30892 and of the revenues allocated by it pursuant to Sections 30913, 30914, and 30914.7.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 650, Sec. 5.   (SB 595)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

30892.

After deduction for its administrative cost, the commission shall allocate the remaining funds to public entities operating public transportation systems and to the department to achieve the commission’s capital planning objectives in the vicinity of toll bridges as set forth in its adopted regional transportation plan. Such objectives shall include, but not be limited, to:

(a) Transbridge corridor trunk transit services.

(b) Feeder service to transbridge trunk transit services.

(c) Bridge traffic control devices required to establish exclusive lanes for transit services.

(d) Transbridge terminal facilities.

(e) Transbridge corridor guideway facilities.

(f) Improvement of alternate public transportation facilities and routings which affect bridge traffic.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------

30893.

The commission may also allocate the funds to public entities and the department for the establishment and operation of ferry systems within the region under the jurisdiction of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------

30894.

The commission shall adopt and distribute procedures for the submission of applications for funding and allocation of funds. Only those applications for projects that will implement the commission’s transportation planning objectives in the vicinity of toll bridges as set forth in its adopted regional transportation plan or the commission’s objectives with respect to ferry systems shall be approved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Toll Ferries in Cities [30900. - 30902.]

30900.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the legislative body of a city may grant upon such terms, limitations, conditions, and restrictions and under such supervision as in its judgment are necessary and proper, franchises, privileges, or licenses for the construction, maintenance, and operation of toll ferries and for the taking and keeping of tolls from such ferries when the following conditions exist:

(a) The toll ferry is operated wholly within the boundaries of such city.

(b) None of the route or routes of such toll ferry constitute
 a part or an extension of a state highway or a state highway route.

(c) No part of the route or routes of the toll ferry for which a franchise, privilege or license is being processed is within 10 miles of a toll bridge in operation or under construction over any body of water across which said toll ferry is to operate.

(d) The director finds that no toll bridge is planned or contemplated in a location where such ferry would compete with it. Failure of the director to make a finding and advise the legislative body of the city of such finding in writing within 30 days after being advised in writing by the legislative body of a city that it is considering granting a franchise, privilege, or license to operate a toll ferry that such a toll bridge is planned or contemplated shall be deemed a finding that no such toll bridge is planned or contemplated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

30901.

In granting any such franchise, privilege, or license, the legislative body may require the grantee thereof to pay an annual fee either in a flat amount or a percentage of the gross receipts derived from the operation of such toll ferry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------

30902.

The provisions of this article do not relieve the operator of a toll ferry from obtaining and maintaining a current and valid certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Public Utilities Commission when such certificate is otherwise required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 658.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. San Francisco Bay Area Bridges [30910. - 30923.]

30910.

(a) The state-owned toll bridges within the geographic jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission are the following bridges:

(1) Antioch Bridge.

(2) Benicia-Martinez Bridge.

(3) Carquinez Bridges.

(4) Dumbarton Bridge.

(5) Richmond-San Rafael Bridge.

(6) San Mateo-Hayward Bridge.

(7) San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.

(b) The Antioch Bridge, the Benicia-Martinez Bridge, the Carquinez Bridges, and the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge are at times classified as the northern bridge unit, and the Dumbarton Bridge, the San Mateo-Hayward Bridge, and the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge are at times classified as the southern bridge unit. For purposes of operation, rehabilitation, maintenance, and financing, all of the bridges are classified as a single enterprise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30910.5.

“Authority” means the Bay Area Toll Authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 58.5.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30910.7.

If the Metropolitan Transportation Commission and the department develop a project to open the third lane on the Richmond-San Rafael Bridge to automobile traffic on the eastbound level and to bicycle traffic on the westbound level, the lead agency may, to the extent feasible, complete the design work for the project simultaneously with the environmental review conducted pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 393, Sec. 2.   (AB 157)   Effective October 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

30911.

(a) The authority shall control and maintain the Bay Area Toll Account and other subaccounts it deems necessary and appropriate to document toll revenue and operating expenditures in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles.

(b) (1) After providing for expenditures pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30912 and for operating assistance pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 30914 and subdivision (c) of Section 30914.7 and after the requirements of any bond resolution or indenture of the authority for any outstanding revenue bonds have been met, the authority shall transfer on a regularly scheduled basis as set forth in the authority’s annual budget resolution, the revenues defined in subdivision (b) of Section 30913 and
 Sections 30914 and 30914.7 to the commission. The funds transferred to the commission shall be expended for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) of Section 30913 and Sections 30914 and 30914.7. After the commission makes a determination that the projects and programs funded by the commission have been completed, the revenues transferred to the commission shall be expended by the commission for supplemental funding for the projects and programs identified in subdivision (a) of Section 30914.7 if the voters approve a toll increase authorized pursuant to Section 30923.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), the revenues defined in subdivision (b) of Section 30913 and subdivision (a) of Section 30914 include all revenues accruing since January 1, 1989.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 206.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

30912.

(a) Revenue derived from tolls on all bridges may be expended, subject to the adopted annual budget of the authority, for any of the following purposes:

(1) Safety and operational costs, including toll collection and maintenance costs in accordance with Section 188.4.

(2) Costs of bridge construction and improvement projects, including seismic retrofit and replacement projects, and including debt service and sinking
 fund payments on bonds issued by the authority for those projects. The repayment of any advances from other state funds may be made from the toll revenue or bond proceeds.

(b) The revenue determined by the authority as derived from the toll increase approved in 1988, and authorized by Section 30917 for class I vehicles on the San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge shall be used, to the extent specified in paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 30914, for the construction of rail extensions specified in Section 30914 or for payment of the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued for those projects, including payments into a sinking fund maintained for that purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 71, Sec. 5.   Effective July 18, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

30913.

(a) In addition to any other authorized expenditure of toll bridge revenues, the following major projects may be funded from toll revenues:

(1) Benicia-Martinez Bridge: Widening of the existing bridge.

(2) Benicia-Martinez Bridge: Construction of an additional span parallel to the existing bridge.

(3) Carquinez Bridge: Replacement of the existing
 western span.

(4) Richmond-San Rafael Bridge: Major rehabilitation of the bridge, and development of a new easterly approach between the toll plaza and Route 80, near Pinole, known as the Richmond Parkway.

(b) The toll increase approved in 1988, which authorized a uniform toll of one dollar ($1) for two-axle vehicles on the bridges and corresponding increases for multi-axle vehicles, resulted in the following toll increases for two-axle vehicles on the bridges:Bridge
1988 Increase
(Two–axle vehicles)Antioch Bridge$0.50Benicia-Martinez Bridge.60Carquinez Bridge.60Dumbarton Bridge.25Richmond-San Rafael Bridge.00San Francisco-Oakland Bay Bridge.25San Mateo-Hayward Bridge.25Portions of the 1988 toll increase were dedicated to transit purposes, and these amounts shall be calculated as up to 2 percent of the revenue generated each year by the collection on all bridges of the base toll at the level established by the 1988 toll increase. The Metropolitan Transportation Commission shall allocate two-thirds of these amounts for transportation projects, other than those specified in Sections 30912 and 30913 and in subdivision (a) of Section 30914, which are designed to reduce vehicular traffic congestion and improve bridge operations on any bridge, including, but not limited to, bicycle facilities and for the planning, construction, operation, and acquisition of rapid water transit systems. The commission shall allocate the remaining one-third solely for the planning, construction, operation, and acquisition of rapid water transit systems. The plans for the projects may also be funded by these moneys. Funds made available for
 rapid water transit systems pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to the San Francisco Bay Area Water Emergency Transportation Authority beginning on the date specified in the adopted transition plan developed by the authority pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 66540.32 of the Government Code.

(c) The department shall not include, in the plans for the new Benicia-Martinez Bridge, toll plazas, highways, or other facilities leading to or from the Benicia-Martinez Bridge, any construction that would result in the net loss of any wetland acreage.

(d) With respect to the Benicia-Martinez and Carquinez Bridges, the department shall consider the potential for rail transit as part of the plans for the new structures specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a).

(e) At the time the first of the new
 bridges specified in paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) is opened to the public, there shall be a lane for the exclusive use of pedestrians and bicycles available on at least, but not limited to, the original span at Benicia or Carquinez, or the additional or replacement spans planned for those bridges. The design of these bridges shall not preclude the subsequent addition of a lane for the exclusive use of pedestrians and bicycles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 387, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

30914.

(a) In addition to any other authorized expenditures of toll bridge revenues, the following major projects may be funded from toll revenues of all bridges:

(1) Dumbarton Bridge: Improvement of the western approaches from Route 101 if affected local governments are involved in the planning.

(2) San Mateo-Hayward Bridge and approaches: Widening of the bridge to six lanes, construction of rail transit capital improvements on the bridge structure, and improvements to the Route 92/Route 880 interchange.

(3) Construction of West Grand connector or an alternate project designed to provide comparable